Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 1

General Provisions

18-1-101. Lien holder form.

Any attachment, claim, encumbrance, financing statement, lien, mortgage, or security agreement filed of record against any real or personal property and any judgment filed of record against any person, firm, or corporation shall display the name, address, and telephone number of the claim holder, lien holder, or judgment creditor, together with the name and title of the person authorized to release the claim, lien, or judgment, or the person's successor.

(2)

If an attachment, a claim, an encumbrance, a financing statement, a lien, a mortgage, a security agreement, or a judgment is filed on or after August 13, 2001, and does not comply with subdivision (a)(1) of this section, notice of an action commenced under §18-50-101 et seq. shall be given by publication as provided in §18-50-105.

(b)

Subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall not be applicable to:

(1)

Any claim holder, lien holder, or judgment creditor that is a financial institution insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; or

(2)

Motor vehicle titles.

(c)

Clerks responsible for recording the documents enumerated in subsection (a) of this section shall ensure that the documents presented for filing display the information required by subsection (a) of this section.

(d)

The validity or priority of any attachment, claim, encumbrance, financing statement, lien, mortgage, or security agreement currently on file, or filed of record after August 13, 2001, shall not be affected by the failure of any person to comply with the requirements of this section.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1125, § 1; 2007, No. 1411, § 1.